cs: Vozidla a náhradní díly > Díly a příslušenství vozidel > Elektronika vozidel > Držáky monitorů do vozidel: Držáky na palubní desku; Držáky na opěrky hlavy; Stropní držáky; Držáky na zpětná zrcátka; Držáky na sedadla; Držáky na sluneční clonu; Držáky na čelní sklo
da: Køretøjer og dele > Dele og tilbehør til køretøjer > Elektronik til motorkøretøjer > Holdere til montering af videoskærme i motorkøretøjer: Dashboard-beslag; Nakkestøttebeslag; Overhead-beslag; Bakspejlbeslag; Sædebeslag; Solskærmbeslag; Forrudebeslag
ru: Транспортные средства, запчасти и аксессуары > Запчасти и аксессуары для транспортных средств > Автомобильная электроника > Крепления для автомобильных видеомониторов: Крепления для передней панели; Крепления для подголовников; Крепления для потолка; Крепления для зеркал заднего вида; Крепления для сидений; Крепления для солнцезащитных козырьков; Крепления для лобового стекла
sl-SI: Vozila in deli > Deli in dodatki za vozila > Elektronika za motorna vozila > Stojala za montažo videomonitorjev v vozilih: Nosilci za armaturo; Nosilci za hrbtno naslonjalo; Stropni nosilci; Nosilci za vzvratna ogledala; Nosilci za sedeže; Nosilci za senčnike; Nosilci za vetrobransko steklo
zh-CN: 交通工具/汽车/飞机/船舶 > 交通工具零件/配件 > 机动车电子产品 > 汽车视频监视器支架: 仪表盘支架; 头枕支架; 头顶支架; 后视镜支架; 座椅支架; 遮阳板支架; 挡风玻璃支架
it: Veicoli e parti > Componenti e accessori per auto > Elettronica per veicoli a motore > Staffe per monitor video per veicoli a motore: Supporti per cruscotto; Supporti per poggiatesta; Supporti sopraelevati; Supporti per specchietti retrovisori; Supporti per sedili; Supporti per visiera parasole; Supporti per parabrezza
ja: 乗り物・パーツ > 乗り物用パーツ・関連用品 > 車載用電子機器 > 車載用ビデオモニタースタンド: ダッシュボードマウント; ヘッドレストマウント; オーバーヘッドマウント; リアビューミラーマウント; シートマウント; サンバイザーマウント; フロントガラスマウント
nb: Kjøretøy og deler > Deler og tilbehør til kjøretøy > Kjøretøyelektronikk > Videoskjermfester til kjøretøy: Dashboardfester; Nakkestøttefester; Takfester; Bakspeilfester; Setefester; Solskjermfester; Frontrutefester
tr: Taşıtlar ve Parçalar > Taşıt Parçaları ve Aksesuarlar > Motorlu Taşıt Elektronik Sistemleri > Motorlu Taşıt Video Monitörü Tutacakları: Kontrol Paneli Montaj Parçaları; Kafalık Montaj Parçaları; Kafa Üstü Montaj Parçaları; Dikiz Aynası Montaj Parçaları; Koltuk Montaj Parçaları; Güneşlik Montaj Parçaları; Ön Cam Montaj Parçaları
ro-RO: Vehicule și piese > Piese și accesorii pentru vehicule > Componente electronice pentru autovehicule > Suporturi cameră video pentru autovehicule: Suporturi bord; Suporturi tetieră; Suporturi plafon; Suporturi oglindă retrovizoare; Suporturi scaune; Suporturi parasolar; Suporturi parbriz
nl: Voertuigen en onderdelen > Voertuigonderdelen en -accessoires > Elektronica voor motorvoertuigen > Videomonitorsteunen voor motorvoertuigen: Dashboardsteunen; Hoofdsteunen; Steunen boven het hoofd; Achteruitkijkspiegelsteunen; Stoelsteunen; Zonneklepsteunen; Voorruitsteunen
lt-LT: Transporto priemonės ir dalys > Transporto priemonių dalys ir priedai > Motorinių transporto priemonių elektronika > Motorinių transporto priemonių vaizdo monitorių laikikliai: Prietaisų skydelio laikikliai; Galvos atramos laikikliai; Viršutiniai laikikliai; Galinio vaizdo veidrodėlių laikikliai; Sėdynės laikikliai; Saulės skydelio laikikliai; Priekinio stiklo laikikliai
hr-HR: Vozila i dijelovi vozila > Dijelovi i oprema za vozila > Elektronika za motorna vozila > Nosači videomonitora za motorna vozila: Nosači nadzorne ploče; Nosači za naslone za glavu; Gornji nosači; Nosači retrovizora; Nosači za sjedala; Nosači za štitnike od sunca; Nosači za vjetrobran
pt-PT: Veículos e peças > Acessórios e peças para veículos > Componentes eletrónicos para veículos motorizados > Suportes de monitor de vídeo para veículos motorizados: Suportes de tablier; Suportes para encosto de cabeça; Suportes suspensos; Suportes para espelho retrovisor; Suportes de assento; Suportes para viseira solar; Suportes para para-brisas
en: Vehicles & Parts > Vehicle Parts & Accessories > Motor Vehicle Electronics > Motor Vehicle Video Monitor Mounts: Dashboard Mounts; Headrest Mounts; Overhead Mounts; Rearview Mirror Mounts; Seat Mounts; Sun Visor Mounts; Windshield Mounts
th: รถยนต์และชิ้นส่วน > ชิ้นส่วนและอุปกรณ์สำหรับยานยนต์ > วงจรอิเล็กทรอนิกส์ในรถยนต์ > ที่ติดตั้งจอในรถยนต์: ที่ยึดแผงหน้าปัด; ที่ยึดพนักพิงศีรษะ; ที่ยึดเหนือศีรษะ; ที่ยึดกระจกมองหลัง; ที่ยึดเบาะนั่ง; ที่ยึดบังแดด; ที่ยึดกระจกรถ
bg-BG: Превозни средства и части > Автомобилни части и аксесоари > Електроника за моторни превозни средства > Стойки за видеомонитори за моторни превозни средства: Стойки за табло; Стойки за облегалка за глава; Стойки над главата; Стойки за огледала за обратно виждане; Стойки за седалки; Стойки за сенник; Стойки за предно стъкло
el: Οχήματα & ανταλλακτικά > Ανταλλακτικά & αξεσουάρ οχημάτων > Ηλεκτρονικά μηχανοκίνητων οχημάτων > Βάσεις οθονών βίντεο οχημάτων: Βάσεις ταμπλό; Βάσεις προσκέφαλου; Βάσεις οροφής; Βάσεις καθρεφτών οπισθοπορείας; Βάσεις καθισμάτων; Βάσεις αλεξήλιων; Βάσεις παρμπρίζ
ko: 차량/부품 > 차량 부품/부대용품 > 자동차 전자 장치 > 자동차 비디오 모니터 마운트: 대시보드 마운트; 헤드레스트 마운트; 오버헤드 마운트; 백미러 마운트; 좌석 마운트; 선바이저 마운트; 윈드실드 마운트
es: Vehículos y recambios > Piezas y accesorios para vehículos > Material electrónico para vehículos motorizados > Soportes para monitores de vídeo para vehículos motorizados: Soportes para salpicadero; Soportes para reposacabezas; Soportes elevados; Soportes para espejo retrovisor; Soportes de asiento; Soportes para parasoles; Soportes para parabrisas
de: Fahrzeuge & Teile > Fahrzeugersatzteile & -zubehör > Kfz-Elektronik > Halterungen für Kfz-Videomonitore: Armaturenbretthalterungen; Kopfstützenhalterungen; Deckenhalterungen; Rückspiegelhalterungen; Sitzhalterungen; Sonnenblendenhalterungen; Frontscheibenhalterungen
pl: Pojazdy i części > Akcesoria i części do pojazdów > Wyposażenie elektroniczne pojazdów silnikowych > Mocowania do samochodowych monitorów wideo: Uchwyty na deskę rozdzielczą; Mocowania zagłówków; Mocowania górne; Mocowania lusterek wstecznych; Mocowania foteli; Mocowania osłon przeciwsłonecznych; Uchwyty na przednią szybę
hu: Járművek és alkatrészek > Járműalkatrészek és -kiegészítők > Gépjármű-elektronika > Gépjárművideómonitor-rögzítők: Műszerfalrögzítők; Fejtámlarögzítők; Fej feletti rögzítők; Visszapillantótükör-rögzítők; Ülésrögzítők; Napellenző-rögzítő; Szélvédőrögzítők
pt-BR: Veículos e peças > Peças e acessórios de veículos > Eletrônicos para veículos motorizados > Suportes de monitor de vídeo para veículos motorizados: Suportes para painel; Suportes para encosto de cabeça; Suporte suspenso; Suportes para espelho retrovisor; Suportes para assento; Suportes para quebra-sol; Suportes para para-brisa
sk-SK: Diely pre vozidlá > Diely a príslušenstvo pre vozidlá > Elektronika motorových vozidiel > Držiaky na video monitor do motorových vozidiel: Držiaky na palubnú dosku; Držiaky na opierku hlavy; Stropné držiaky; Držiaky na spätnom zrkadle; Držiaky na sedadle; Držiaky na slnečnej clone; Držiaky na čelnom skle
fi: Ajoneuvot ja osat > Ajoneuvojen osat ja tarvikkeet > Moottoriajoneuvojen elektroniikka > Moottoriajoneuvojen videonäyttöjen telineet: Kojelautatelineet; Niskatukitelineet; Kattotelineet; Taustapeilitelineet; Istuintelineet; Aurinkosuojatelineet; Tuulilasitelineet
vi: Xe và phụ tùng > Bộ phận và phụ kiện xe cộ > Thiết bị điện tử xe cơ giới > Giá treo màn hình video trên xe cơ giới: Giá đỡ bảng điều khiển; Giá gắn gối tựa đầu; Giá gắn trên cao; Giá gắn gương chiếu hậu; Giá gắn ghế; Giá gắn tấm che nắng; Giá gắn kính chắn gió
sv: Fordon och delar > Fordonsdelar och tillbehör > Fordonselektronik > Monteringssatser för videoskärmar: Instrumentbrädesfästen; Nackstödsfästen; Overheadfästen; Backspegelfästen; Sätesfästen; Solskyddsfästen; Vindrutefästen
zh-TW: 車輛與零配件 > 車輛零件/配件 > 汽機車電子裝置 > 汽機車用螢幕支架: 儀表板支架; 頭枕支架; 頭頂支架; 後視鏡支架; 座椅支架; 遮陽板支架; 擋風玻璃支架
fr: Véhicules et accessoires > Pièces détachées pour véhicules > Électronique pour véhicules > Supports d'écrans vidéo pour véhicules: Supports pour tableau de bord; Supports pour appui-tête; Supports aériens; Supports de rétroviseur; Supports de siège; Supports pour pare-soleil; Supports de pare-brise